District of Columbia statutes.
47-2312

Prosecutions.

All prosecutions for violations of the provisions of §§ 47-2301 to 47-2315 or regulations prescribed thereunder may be in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, upon information filed by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia or any of his assistants; and all suits for the collection of any tax or penalty under §§ 47-2301 to 47-2315 or such regulations shall be instituted by the Attorney General for the District of Columbia or any of his assistants.

History

Apr. 23, 1924, 43 Stat. 106, ch. 131, § 15
Apr. 1, 1942, 56 Stat. 190, ch. 207, § 1
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(a)
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-354, § 73(h), 52 DCR 2638

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-2312.
1973 Ed., § 47-1913.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-354 substituted “Attorney General for the District of Columbia” for “Corporation Counsel”.